Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1575
Discovery of property of debtor; proceedings; continuance.

The judge or referee, acting under the provisions of sections 25-1564 to 25-1580, shall have power to continue his proceedings from time to time until they are completed.

R.S.1867, Code § 544, p. 489;

R.S.1913, § 8123;

C.S.1922, § 9059;

C.S.1929, § 20-1577;

R.S.1943, § 25-1575.